Utah statutes.
58-55-302.7.   Continuing education requirements for electricians and
plumbers.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Licensed electrician" means an individual licensed under this chapter as
an apprentice electrician, journeyman electrician, master electrician,
residential journeyman electrician, or residential master electrician.
(b)  "Licensed plumber" means an individual licensed under this chapter as an
apprentice plumber, journeyman plumber, master plumber, residential journeyman
plumber, or residential master plumber.
(2)  Beginning December 1, 2010, during each two-year renewal cycle
established by rule under Subsection 58-55-303(1):
(a)  a licensed electrician shall complete 16 hours of continuing education
under the continuing education program established under this section; and
(b)  a licensed plumber shall complete 12 hours of continuing education under
the continuing education program established under this section.
(3)  The commission shall, with the concurrence of the division, establish by
rule:
(a)  a continuing education program for licensed electricians; and
(b)  a continuing education program for licensed plumbers.
(4)  The division may contract with a person to establish and maintain a
continuing education registry to include:
(a)  an online application for a continuing education course provider to apply
to the division for approval of the course for inclusion in the continuing
education program;
(b)  a list of courses that the division has approved for inclusion in the
continuing education program; and
(c)  a list of courses that:
(i)  a licensed electrician or licensed plumber has completed under the
continuing education program; and
(ii)  the licensed electrician or licensed plumber may access to monitor
compliance with the continuing education requirement under Subsection (2).
(5)  The division may charge a fee, established by the division under Section
63J-1-504, to administer the requirements of this section.
